Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-507
Game bird, game
animal, or game fish;
abandonment or needless waste; penalty.

Any person
who at any time takes any game bird, game animal, or game fish other than baitfish in this state
and who intentionally leaves or abandons such bird, animal, or fish or an
edible portion thereof resulting in wanton or needless waste or otherwise
intentionally allows it or an edible portion thereof to be wantonly or needlessly
wasted or fails to dispose thereof in a reasonable and sanitary manner shall
be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1959, c. 150, § 11, p. 575;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 197;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-525;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 227;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 29.